Utah statutes.
63G-6a-2302.   Duty to report factual information to attorney general.

If a procurement unit has reason to believe that a person has engaged in a violation of Section 63G-6a-2304.5, collusion, or other anticompetitive practices relating to a procurement or a potential procurement, the procurement unit shall transmit a notice of the relevant facts to the attorney general.



Amended by Chapter 445, 2013 General Session

